Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska7-106
Deceit or collusion; penalty.

An attorney and counselor who is guilty of deceit or collusion, or consents thereto, with intent to deceive a court, or judge, or a party to an action or proceeding, is liable to be disbarred.

R.S.1866, c. 3, § 6, p. 15;

R.S.1913, § 270;

C.S.1922, § 265;

C.S.1929, § 7-106;

R.S.1943, § 7-106;

Laws 1963, c. 25, § 1, p. 128.

1. Disbarment

2. Suspension

3. Civil liability

1. Disbarment

Supreme Court reporter who was also attorney violated this section by demanding $2,500 from printer to guarantee renewal of contract to print Nebraska Reports; respondent disbarred. State ex rel. Nebraska State Bar Assn. v. Green, 210 Neb. 878, 317 N.W.2d 97 (1982).

Manipulation of transfer of judgment to mislead court into allowance of a wrongful set-off warrants disbarment. State ex rel. Nebraska State Bar Assn. v. Hendrickson, 138 Neb. 846, 295 N.W. 892 (1941), on rehearing, 139 Neb. 522, 298 N.W. 148 (1941).

Attorney who obtains loan from client by false representations respecting the mortgage security is guilty of such misconduct as to justify disbarment. State ex rel. Nebraska State Bar Assn. v. Basye, 138 Neb. 806, 295 N.W. 816 (1941).

Failure of attorney to account for, or the misappropriation of, money of his clients received in his professional capacity is ground for disbarment of attorney. State ex rel. Nebraska State Bar Assn. v. McGan, 138 Neb. 665, 294 N.W. 430 (1940).

Conversion of funds of client received from settlement of judgment and refusal to give client information as to status of judgment required disbarment of attorney. State ex rel. Nebraska State Bar Association v. Hyde, 138 Neb. 541, 293 N.W. 408 (1940).

Deceit practiced upon client in sale of stock sustains disbarment. State ex rel. Hunter v. Marconnit, 134 Neb. 898, 280 N.W. 216 (1938).

Misappropriation of money belonging to client warrants disbarment. State ex rel. Hunter v. Hatteroth, 134 Neb. 451, 279 N.W. 153 (1938).

Failure to account to client for money received in a professional capacity is sufficient to justify disbarment. State ex rel. Hunter v. Boe, 134 Neb. 162, 278 N.W. 144 (1938).

Conviction of attorney of embezzlement is conclusive evidence warranting disbarment. State ex rel. Wright v. Sowards, 134 Neb. 159, 278 N.W. 148 (1938).

An attorney, representing a defendant in a criminal prosecution, who procures or induces a material witness for the prosecution to absent himself from the trial and conceal his whereabouts is guilty of such conduct as to merit disbarment. State ex rel. Good v. Cooper, 131 Neb. 771, 270 N.W. 310 (1936).

Misappropriation of money belonging to client is such disregard of duty as to warrant disbarment of attorney. State ex rel. Sorensen v. Goldman, 127 Neb. 340, 255 N.W. 32 (1934).

Securing of money from clients for court costs in promised litigation where attorney knew, through lapse of time and other causes that claims were uncollectible, is equivalent to fraud and deceit and justifies disbarment. State ex rel. Sorensen v. Ireland, 125 Neb. 570, 251 N.W. 119 (1933).

Conversion of money of minors by attorney while acting as their guardian sustained disbarment. State ex rel. Good v. Black, 125 Neb. 382, 251 N.W. 109 (1933).

Restitution of money embezzled does not justify reinstatement of attorney disbarred for misappropriation of funds. State ex rel. Spillman v. Priest, 123 Neb. 241, 242 N.W. 433 (1932).

Attorney who fails to account for money collected by him for client and entrusted to him by client for purpose of investment is guilty of misconduct justifying disbarment. State ex rel. Spillman v. Priest, 118 Neb. 47, 223 N.W. 635 (1929).

An attorney who knowingly uses forgery of another to impose upon a court is guilty of such conduct as to warrant disbarment. State v. Fisher, 103 Neb. 736, 174 N.W. 320 (1919).

This section was not intended to limit the inherent powers of the court. In re Dunn, 85 Neb. 606, 124 N.W. 120 (1909).

Preparation of false affidavit where there is no attempt to make use of it in any way to deceive court is not ground for disbarment. In re Watson, 83 Neb. 211, 119 N.W. 451 (1909).

Evidence offered insufficient to establish by clear preponderance that attorney attempted to deceive court. In re Newby, 82 Neb. 235, 117 N.W. 691 (1908).

District court can disbar an attorney from practice before it for deceit practiced upon that court, but Supreme Court has sole power to disbar generally. In re Disbarment Proceedings of Newby, 76 Neb. 482, 107 N.W. 850 (1906).

Disbarment is a special proceeding. Morton v. Watson, 60 Neb. 672, 84 N.W. 91 (1900).

Conspiracy to bribe juror participated in by attorney warranted disbarment. Blodgett v. State, 50 Neb. 121, 69 N.W. 751 (1897).

Validity and effectiveness of judicial power to disbar attorneys is recognized. Niklaus v. Simmons, 196 F.Supp. 691 (D. Neb. 1961).

2. Suspension

Tampering with exhibit received in evidence was conduct justifying suspension from practice. State ex rel. Nebraska State Bar Assn. v. Fisher, 170 Neb. 483, 103 N.W.2d 325 (1960).

Presentation of claim to Legislature supported by an appraisement that attorney knew had been fraudulently altered was sufficient to justify suspension. State v. Fisher, 82 Neb. 361, 117 N.W. 882 (1908).

Attorney, who removed case to federal court by filing affidavit of local prejudice when his real reason was to secure allowance of attorney's fees not recoverable in state court, was subject to reprimand. In re Breckenridge, 31 Neb. 489, 48 N.W. 142 (1891).

Procuring release of prisoner under sentence of death through imposition on a United States Commissioner was such conduct as to justify suspension for two years. State ex rel. Attorney General v. Burr, 19 Neb. 593, 28 N.W. 261 (1886).

3. Civil liability

Recovery of treble the actual damages sustained is unconstitutional. Abel v. Conover, 170 Neb. 926, 104 N.W.2d 684 (1960).

In civil action to recover treble damages under this section, evidence did not disclose any fraud, deceit or any unprofessional conduct. Martin v. Reavis, 117 Neb. 219, 220 N.W. 238 (1928).